New York, session 2025-2026, A6171.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The domestic relations law is amended by adding a new 2 section 240-e to read as follows: 3 § 240-e. Required information a custodial parent must disclose to a 4 non-custodial parent. If a custodial parent lives with a sex offender, 5 such parent shall be required to disclose that information to the non- 6 custodial parent. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08658-01-5